Utah statutes.
39-6-37.   Second trial on an offense prohibited.
(1)  A person may not, without his written consent, be brought to trial a
second time in any military or civilian court of the state for the same
offense.
(2)  A proceeding in which an accused has been found guilty by a military
court upon any charge or specification, is not a trial under this section
until the finding of guilty has become final and the review of the case has
been completed.
(3)  A proceeding that, after the introduction of evidence but before a
finding, is dismissed or terminated by the convening authority or on motion of
the prosecution for failure of available evidence or witnesses without any
fault of the accused is a trial under this section.
